da: Metode til dobbelt trommepedals ophæng: Rem; Kæde; Drivaksel; Andet
sv: Medium för länkning mellan dubbeltrumpedaler: Rem; Kedja; Drivaxel; Övrigt
ro-RO: Mecanism de transmisie pentru pedală dublă de tobe: Curea; Lanț; Ax de transmisie; Altele
nb: Dobbel trommepedalkobling medium: Reim; Kjede; Drivaksel; Annet
pt-PT: Ligação de pedal de tambor duplo médio: Correia; Corrente; Veio de transmissão; Outro
tr: Çift tambur pedal bağlantısı orta boy: Kayış; Zincir; Tahrik mili; Diğer
en: Double drum pedal linkage medium: Belt; Chain; Driveshaft; Other
nl: Dubbel bassdrumpedaal koppelingsmedium: Riem; Ketting; Aandrijfas; Overige
sl-SI: Medij povezave dvojnega pedala za bas boben: Jermen; Veriga; Pogonska gred; Drugo
hu: Dupla dobpedál-összekötőelem közeg: Szíj; Lánc; Közvetlen tengelyes; Egyéb
vi: Phương tiện liên kết bàn đạp trống kép: Dây đai; Xích; Trục dẫn động; Khác
ja: ダブルドラムペダルリンケージ媒体: ベルト; チェーン; ドライブシャフト; その他
de: Verbindungsmechanismus des Doppelfußmaschinenpedals: Riemen; Kette; Antriebswelle; Sonstige
cs: Typ spojovacího média dvojitého bubnového pedálu: Řemen; Řetěz; Hnací hřídel; Jiné
pl: Medium połączenia podwójnego pedału perkusyjnego: Pasek; Łańcuch; Wał napędowy; Inne
hr-HR: Srednja poluga pedale s dvostrukim bubnjem: Remen; Lanac; Pogonska osovina; Ostalo
zh-CN: 双鼓踏板联动中型: 皮带; 链条; 传动轴; 其他
it: Collegamento a doppio pedale per batteria medio: Cinghia; Catena; Albero di trasmissione; Altro
ko: 더블 드럼 페달 연결 방식: 벨트; 체인; 드라이브 샤프트; 기타
es: Medio de engranaje de pedal de doble tambor: Correa; Cadena; Eje de transmisión; Otro
sk-SK: spojovací mechanizmus dvojitého pedála basového bubna (stredná dĺžka): Pás; Reťaz; Hnací hriadeľ; Iné
el: Μέσο σύνδεσης διπλού πεντάλ τυμπάνου: Ιμάντας; Αλυσίδα; Κινητήριος άξονας; Άλλο
fr: Système de transmission de la double pédale de grosse caisse: Courroie; Chaîne; Arbre de transmission; Autre
ru: Тип привода двойной бас-бочки: Ремень; Цепь; Карданный вал; Другое
zh-TW: 雙大鼓踏板連動媒介: 皮帶; 鏈條; 傳動軸; 其他
lt-LT: Dvigubo būgno pedalo jungties terpė: Diržas; Grandinė; Kardaninis velenas; Kita
pt-BR: Ligação de pedal de tambor duplo médio: Correia; Corrente; Eixo de transmissão; Outros
bg-BG: Тип свързващ механизъм на двоен педал за барабан: Ремък; Верига; Задвижващ вал; Друго
th: การเชื่อมต่อแป้นเหยียบกลองคู่ขนาดกลาง: สายพาน; โซ่; เพลาขับ; อื่นๆ
fi: Tuplarumpupedaalin yhdistämistapa: Hihna; Ketju; Vetoakseli; Muu